include/root-guesser.lexc
LEXICON Root
	Noun;
	Adjective;
	Verb;

LEXICON Noun
	PNominalStem	Tag_N_Guess;

LEXICON Adjective
	PNominalStem	Tag_A_Guess;

LEXICON Verb
	PVerbalStem	Tag_V_Guess;

LEXICON Tag_N_Guess
	[N]%:Guess:0	N_StemBoundary;


LEXICON Tag_A_Guess
	[A]%:Guess:0	A_StemBoundary;

LEXICON Tag_V_Guess
	[V]%:Guess:0	V_StemBoundary;
